Maryland, session 2026, SB0869.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Economic Development
SUBTITLE 7. MARYLAND WORKFORCE LAUNCH PILOT PROGRAM.
3–701.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE MARYLAND WORKFORCE LAUNCH PILOT
PROGRAM.
(C) “QUALIFIED BUSINESS ENTITY” MEANS A BUSINESS ENTITY THAT:
(1) DOES NOT HAVE A PHYSICAL LOCATION IN THE STATE;
(2) IS IN ACTIVE NEGOTIATIONS WITH THE DEPARTMENT TO
ESTABLISH A LOCATION IN THE STATE FROM OUTSIDE THE STATE; AND
(3) ENTERS INTO AN AGREEMENT WITH THE DEPARTMENT TO
PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM.
– 1 –

Ch. 535 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(D) “STRATEGIC INDUSTRY” MEANS AN INDUSTRY SECTOR IDENTIFIED BY
THE DEPARTMENT IN THE STATE’S ECONOMIC STRATEGIC PLAN.
3–702.
THERE IS A MARYLAND WORKFORCE LAUNCH PILOT PROGRAM IN THE
DEPARTMENT.
3–703.
THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO PROVIDE CUSTOMIZED, NO–COST
WORKFORCE TRAINING AS A BUSINESS ATTRACTION TOOL TO RECRUIT STRATEGIC
INDUSTRIES AND QUALIFIED BUSINESS ENTITIES TO THE STATE.
3–704.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PARTNER WITH NOT MORE THAN TWO
COMMUNITY COLLEGES IN THE STATE TO DELIVER TRAINING SERVICES UNDER THE
PROGRAM.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DISTRIBUTE FUNDS TO A PARTNER
COMMUNITY COLLEGE TO COVER THE DIRECT COSTS OF DEVELOPING AND
DELIVERING CUSTOMIZED TRAINING FOR A QUALIFIED BUSINESS ENTITY.
(D) FOR EACH QUALIFIED BUSINESS ENTITY RECEIVING ASSISTANCE
UNDER THE PROGRAM, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH PERFORMANCE
METRICS, INCLUDING:
(1) THE NUMBER OF FULL–TIME JOBS CREATED; AND
(2) THE SALARY THAT THE QUALIFIED BUSINESS ENTITY IS
PROVIDING TO THE INDIVIDUALS BEING TRAINED.
3–705.
(A) ANY CURRICULUM, MANUALS, OR INSTRUCTIONAL MATERIALS
DEVELOPED BY A COMMUNITY COLLEGE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE SHALL BE OWNED
BY THE COMMUNITY COLLEGE.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 535
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL INCLUDE IN EACH AGREEMENT WITH A
QUALIFIED BUSINESS ENTITY A PROVISION REQUIRING THE QUALIFIED BUSINESS
ENTITY TO REIMBURSE THE DEPARTMENT FOR THE COST OF THE TRAINING
SERVICES IF THE QUALIFIED BUSINESS ENTITY FAILS TO MEET THE PERFORMANCE
METRICS ESTABLISHED UNDER § 3–704 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
3–706.
ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2028, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SUBMIT A
REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON THE EFFECTIVENESS OF THE
PROGRAM, INCLUDING REVENUE GENERATED BY THE QUALIFIED BUSINESS
ENTITIES, JOBS CREATED BY QUALIFIED BUSINESS ENTITIES, AND
RECOMMENDATIONS FOR STATEWIDE EXPANSION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and, at the end of September
30, 2029, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 3 –